Mississippi statutes. Title 47. Prisons and Prisoners; Probation and Parole
Probation and Parole Law
§ 47-7-18.
Conditions for
release of parole-eligible inmates without hearing; hearing required
under certain circumstances.

Each inmate eligiblefor parole pursuant to Section 47-7-3, shall bereleased from incarceration to parole supervision on the inmate’sparole eligibility date, without a hearing before the board, if:

The inmate hasmet the requirements of the parole case plan established pursuantto Section47-7-3.1;

A victim of theoffense has not requested the board conduct a hearing;

The inmate hasnot received a serious or major violation report within the past six(6) months;

The inmate hasagreed to the conditions of supervision; and

The inmate hasa discharge plan approved by the board.

At least thirty(30) days prior to an inmate’s parole eligibility date, thedepartment shall notify the board in writing of the inmate’scompliance or noncompliance with the case plan. If an inmate failsto meet a requirement of the case plan, prior to the parole eligibilitydate, he or she shall have a hearing before the board to determineif completion of the case plan can occur while in the community.

Any inmate forwhom there is insufficient information for the department to determinecompliance with the case plan shall have a hearing with the board.

A hearing shallbe held with the board if requested by the victim following notificationof the inmate’s parole release date pursuant to Section 47-7-17.

A hearing shallbe held by the board if a law enforcement official from the communityto which the inmate will return contacts the board or the departmentand requests a hearing to consider information relevant to publicsafety risks posed by the inmate if paroled at the initial paroleeligibility date. The law enforcement official shall submit an explanationdocumenting these concerns for the board to consider.

If a parole hearingis held, the board may determine the inmate has sufficiently compliedwith the case plan or that the incomplete case plan is not the faultof the inmate and that granting parole is not incompatible with publicsafety, the board may then parole the inmate with appropriate conditions.If the board determines that the inmate has sufficiently compliedwith the case plan but the discharge plan indicates that the inmatedoes not have appropriate housing immediately upon release, the boardmay parole the inmate to a transitional reentry center with the conditionthat the inmate spends no more than six (6) months in the center.If the board determines that the inmate has not substantively compliedwith the requirement(s) of the case plan it may deny parole. If theboard denies parole, the board may schedule a subsequent parole hearingand, if a new date is scheduled, the board shall identify the correctiveaction the inmate will need to take in order to be granted parole.Any inmate not released at the time of the inmate’s initialparole date shall have a parole hearing at least every year.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 457, § 44, effective from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 47-7-19.
Correctional system
officials to permit access to offenders and to give information to
board.

It shall be theduty of all correctional system officials to grant to the membersof the board or its properly accredited representatives, access atall reasonable times to any person over whom the board may have jurisdictionunder this chapter; to provide for the board or such representativesfacilities for communicating with and observing the offender; andto furnish to the board such reports as the board shall require concerningthe conduct and character of any offender in the department of correctionscustody and any other facts deemed by the board pertinent in determiningwhether such offender shall be paroled.

It shall be theduty of any judge, district attorney, county attorney, police officer,or other public official of the state, having information with referenceto any person eligible for parole, to send such information as maybe in his possession or under his control to the board, in writing,upon request of any member or employee thereof.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4004-10; Laws, 1950, ch. 524, § 11; Laws, 1956, ch. 262, § 5; Laws, 1976, ch. 440, § 83; reenacted, Laws, 1981, ch. 465, § 99; reenacted, Laws, 1984, ch. 471, § 109; reenacted, Laws, 1986, ch. 413, § 109, eff from and after passage (approved March 28, 1986).

§ 47-7-21.
Privileged information.

All informationobtained in the discharge of official duty by a field officer as anemployee of the Department of Corrections shall be privileged andshall not be disclosed directly or indirectly to anyone other thanto (a) the State Parole Board, (b) a judge, or (c) law enforcementagencies when such information is relevant to criminal activity.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4004-16; Laws, 1950, ch. 524, § 17; brought forward, Laws, 1981, ch. 465, § 100; reenacted, Laws, 1984, ch. 471, § 110; reenacted, Laws, 1986, ch. 413, § 110; Laws, 1987, ch. 340, eff from and after July 1, 1987.

§ 47-7-23.
Rules and regulations.

Except as otherwiseprovided by law, the Department of Corrections shall have the powerand duty to make rules for the conduct of persons heretofore or hereafterplaced on parole under the supervision of the Department of Correctionsand for the investigation and supervision of such persons, which supervisionmay include a condition that such persons submit, as provided in Section 47-5-601, to anytype of breath, saliva or urine chemical analysis test, the purposeof which is to detect the possible presence of alcohol or a substanceprohibited or controlled by any law of the State of Mississippi orthe United States. The department shall not make any rules which shallbe inconsistent with the rules imposed by the State Parole Board pursuantto Section 47-7-17 on offenderswho are placed on unsupervised parole.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4004-12; Laws, 1944, ch. 334, § 17; Laws, 1950, ch. 524, § 13; Laws, 1976, ch. 440, § 84; reenacted, Laws, 1981, ch. 465, § 101; Laws, 1983, ch. 435, § 5; reenacted, Laws, 1984, ch. 471, § 111; reenacted, Laws, 1986, ch. 413, § 111; Laws, 1986, ch. 424, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1986.

§ 47-7-25.
Gratuities to paroled
offender.

When an offenderis placed on parole he shall receive, if needed, from the state, civilianclothing and transportation to the place in which he is to reside.At the discretion of the board the offender may be advanced such sumfor his temporary maintenance as the board may allow. The aforesaidgratuities are to be furnished by the commissioner of correctionswho is authorized to charge the actual cost of same in his accountas commissioner of corrections.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4004-11; Laws, 1944, ch. 334, § 13; Laws, 1950, ch. 524, § 12; Laws, 1976, ch. 440, § 85; reenacted, Laws, 1981, ch. 465, § 102; reenacted, Laws, 1984, ch. 471, § 112; reenacted, Laws, 1986, ch. 413, § 112, eff from and after passage (approved March 28, 1986).

§ 47-7-27.
Return of violator
of parole or earned release supervision; arrest of offender; hearing;
revocation of parole; imprisonment for technical violation to be served
in technical violation center.

The board may,at any time and upon a showing of probable violation of parole, issuea warrant for the return of any paroled offender to the custody ofthe department. The warrant shall authorize all persons named thereinto return the paroled offender to actual custody of the departmentfrom which he was paroled.

Any field supervisormay arrest an offender without a warrant or may deputize any otherperson with power of arrest by giving him a written statement settingforth that the offender has, in the judgment of that field supervisor,violated the conditions of his parole or earned-release supervision.The written statement delivered with the offender by the arrestingofficer to the official in charge of the department facility fromwhich the offender was released or other place of detention designatedby the department shall be sufficient warrant for the detention ofthe offender.

The field supervisor,after making an arrest, shall present to the detaining authoritiesa similar statement of the circumstances of violation. The field supervisorshall at once notify the board or department of the arrest and detentionof the offender and shall submit a written report showing in whatmanner the offender has violated the conditions of parole or earned-releasesupervision. An offender for whose return a warrant has been issuedby the board shall, after the issuance of the warrant, be deemed afugitive from justice.

Whenever an offenderis arrested on a warrant for an alleged violation of parole as hereinprovided, the board shall hold an informal preliminary hearing withinseventy-two (72) hours to determine whether there is reasonable causeto believe the person has violated a condition of parole. A preliminaryhearing shall not be required when the offender is not under arreston a warrant or the offender signed a waiver of a preliminary hearing.The preliminary hearing may be conducted electronically.

The right ofthe State of Mississippi to extradite persons and return fugitivesfrom justice, from other states to this state, shall not be impairedby this chapter and shall remain in full force and effect. An offenderconvicted of a felony committed while on parole, whether in the Stateof Mississippi or another state, shall immediately have his parolerevoked upon presentment of a certified copy of the commitment orderto the board. If an offender is on parole and the offender is convictedof a felony for a crime committed prior to the offender being placedon parole, whether in the State of Mississippi or another state, theoffender may have his parole revoked upon presentment of a certifiedcopy of the commitment order to the board.

The board shallhold a hearing for any parolee who is detained as a result of a warrantor a violation report within twenty-one (21) days of the parolee’sadmission to detention. The board may, in its discretion, terminatethe parole or modify the terms and conditions thereof. If the boardrevokes parole for one or more technical violations theboard shall impose a period of imprisonment to be served in a technicalviolation center operated by the department not to exceed ninety (90)days for the first revocation and not to exceed one hundred twenty (120) days for the second revocation. For the third revocation, the board may impose a periodof imprisonment to be served in a technical violation center for upto one hundred and eighty (180) days or the board may impose the remainderof the suspended portion of the sentence. For the fourth and any subsequent revocation, the board may impose upto the remainder of the suspended portion of the sentence. The periodof imprisonment in a technical violation center imposed under thissection shall not be reduced in any manner.

If the boarddoes not hold a hearing or does not take action on the violation withinthe twenty-one-day time frame in paragraph (a) of this subsection,the parolee shall be released from detention and shall return to parolestatus. The board may subsequently hold a hearing and may revoke paroleor may continue parole and modify the terms and conditions of parole.If the board revokes parole for one ormore technical violations the board shall impose a period of imprisonment tobe served in a technical violation center operated by the departmentnot to exceed ninety (90) days for the first revocation and not to exceed one hundred twenty (120)days for the second revocation. For the third revocation, the board may impose a period of imprisonment to be served in atechnical violation center for up to one hundred eighty (180) daysor the board may impose the remainder of the suspended portion ofthe sentence. For the fourth and any subsequent revocation, the board may impose upto the remainder of the suspended portion of the sentence. The periodof imprisonment in a technical violation center imposed under thissection shall not be reduced in any manner.

For a paroleecharged with one or more technical violations whohas not been detained awaiting the revocation hearing, the board mayhold a hearing within a reasonable time. The board may revoke paroleor may continue parole and modify the terms and conditions of parole.If the board revokes parole for one ormore technical violations the board shall impose a period of imprisonment tobe served in a technical violation center operated by the departmentnot to exceed ninety (90) days for the first revocation and not to exceed one hundred twenty (120)days for the second revocation. For the third revocation, the board may impose a period of imprisonment to be served in atechnical violation center for up to one hundred eighty (180) daysor the board may impose the remainder of the suspended portion ofthe sentence. For the fourth and any subsequent revocation, the board may impose upto the remainder of the suspended portion of the sentence. The periodof imprisonment in a technical violation center imposed under thissection shall not be reduced in any manner.

Unless good causefor the delay is established in the record of the proceeding, theparole revocation charge shall be dismissed if the revocation hearingis not held within the thirty (30) days of the issuance of the warrant.

The chairmanand each member of the board and the designated parole revocationhearing officer may, in the discharge of their duties, administeroaths, summon and examine witnesses, and take other steps as may benecessary to ascertain the truth of any matter about which they havethe right to inquire.

The board shallprovide semiannually to the Oversight Task Force the number of warrantsissued for an alleged violation of parole, the average time betweendetention on a warrant and preliminary hearing, the average time betweendetention on a warrant and revocation hearing, the number of ninety-daysentences in a technical violation center issued by the board, thenumber of one-hundred-twenty-day sentences in a technical violationcenter issued by the board, the number of one-hundred-eighty-day sentencesissued by the board, and the number and average length of the suspendedsentences imposed by the board in response to a violation.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4004-13; Laws, 1944, ch. 334, § 11; Laws, 1950, ch. 524, § 14; Laws, 1956, ch. 262, § 6; Laws, 1976, ch. 440, § 86; reenacted, Laws, 1981, ch. 465, § 103; reenacted, Laws, 1984, ch. 471, § 113; Laws, 1986, ch. 357, § 1; reenacted, Laws, 1986, ch. 413, § 113; Laws, 1989, ch. 306, § 1; Laws, 1995, ch. 596, § 7; Laws, 2010, ch. 470, § 1; Laws, 2012, ch. 488, § 1; Laws, 2014, ch. 457, § 56, eff from and after July 1, 2014; Laws, 2018, ch. 416, § 10, eff from and after July 1, 2018.

§ 47-7-29.
Effect of conviction
of felony while on parole or earned-release supervision.

Any prisonerwho commits a felony while at large upon parole or earned-releasesupervision and who is convicted and sentenced therefor shall be requiredto serve such sentence after the original sentence has been completed.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4004-14; Laws, 1950, ch. 524, § 15; brought forward, Laws, 1981, ch. 465, § 104; reenacted, Laws, 1984, ch. 471, § 114; reenacted, Laws, 1986, ch. 413, § 114; Laws, 1995, ch. 596, § 8, eff from and after June 30, 1995.

§ 47-7-31.
Department of correction
to investigate pardon and commutation of sentence cases upon request.

Upon requestof the governor the department of corrections shall investigate andreport to him with respect to any case of pardon, commutation of sentence,reprieve, furlough or remission of fine or forfeiture.

Any attorneyof record in the state of Mississippi representing any person whoserecord is before the department shall have the right to inspect suchrecords on file with the department.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4004-15; Laws, 1942, ch. 283; Laws, 1944, ch. 334, § 15; Laws, 1950, ch. 524, § 16; Laws, 1952, ch. 382; Laws, 1956, ch. 262, § 7; Laws, 1976, ch. 440, § 87; reenacted, Laws, 1981, ch. 465, § 105; reenacted, Laws, 1984, ch. 471, § 115; reenacted, Laws, 1986, ch. 413, § 115, eff from and after passage (approved March 28, 1986).

§ 47-7-33.
Power of court
to suspend sentence and place defendant on probation; notice to Department
of Corrections; support payments.

When it appearsto the satisfaction of any circuit court or county court in the Stateof Mississippi having original jurisdiction over criminal actions,or to the judge thereof, that the ends of justice and the best interestof the public, as well as the defendant, will be served thereby, suchcourt, in termtime or in vacation, shall have the power, after convictionor a plea of guilty, except in a case where a death sentence or lifeimprisonment is the maximum penalty which may be imposed, to suspendthe imposition or execution of sentence, and place the defendant onprobation as herein provided, except that the court shall not suspendthe execution of a sentence of imprisonment after the defendant shallhave begun to serve such sentence. In placing any defendant on probation,the court, or judge, shall direct that such defendant be under thesupervision of the Department of Corrections.

When any circuitor county court places an offender on probation, the court shall givenotice to the Mississippi Department of Corrections within fifteen(15) days of the court’s decision to place the offender onprobation. Notice shall be delivered to the central office of theMississippi Department of Corrections and to the regional office ofthe department which will be providing supervision to the offenderon probation.

When any circuitcourt or county court places a person on probation in accordance withthe provisions of this section and that person is ordered to makeany payments to his family, if any member of his family whom he isordered to support is receiving public assistance through the StateDepartment of Human Services, the court shall order him to make suchpayments to the county welfare officer of the county rendering publicassistance to his family, for the sole use and benefit of said family.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4004-23; Laws, 1956, ch. 262, § 10; Laws, 1958, ch. 242; Laws, 1976, ch. 440, § 88; reenacted, Laws, 1981, ch. 465, § 106; reenacted, Laws, 1984, ch. 471, § 116; reenacted, Laws, 1986, ch. 413, § 116; Laws, 2000, ch. 622, § 2; Laws, 2014, ch. 457, § 10, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 47-7-33.1.
Pre-release
assessment and written discharge plan.

The departmentshall create a discharge plan for any offender returning to the community,regardless of whether the person will discharge from the custody ofthe department, or is released on parole, pardon, or otherwise. Atleast ninety (90) days prior to an offender’s earliest releasedate, the commissioner shall conduct a pre-release assessment andcomplete a written discharge plan based on the assessment results.The discharge plan for parole eligible offenders shall be sent tothe parole board at least thirty (30) days prior to the offender’sparole eligibility date for approval. The board may suggest changesto the plan that it deems necessary to ensure a successful transition.

The pre-releaseassessment shall identify whether an inmate requires assistance obtainingthe following basic needs upon release: transportation, clothing andfood, financial resources, identification documents, housing, employment,education, health care and support systems. The discharge plan shallinclude information necessary to address these needs and the stepsbeing taken by the department to assist in this process. Based onthe findings of the assessment, the commissioner shall:

Arrange transportationfor inmates from the correctional facility to their release destination;

Ensure inmateshave clean, seasonally appropriate clothing, and provide inmates witha list of food providers and other basic resources immediately accessibleupon release;

Ensure inmateshave a driver’s license or a state-issued identification cardthat is not a Department of Corrections identification card;

Assist inmatesin identifying safe, affordable housing upon release. If accommodationsare not available, determine whether temporary housing is availablefor at least ten (10) days after release. If temporary housing isnot available, the discharge plan shall reflect that satisfactoryhousing has not been established and the person may be a candidatefor transitional reentry center placement;

Refer inmateswithout secured employment to employment opportunities;

Provide inmateswith contact information of a health care facility/provider in thecommunity in which they plan to reside;

Notify familymembers of the release date and release plan, if inmate agrees; and

Refer inmatesto a community or a faith-based organization that can offer supportwithin the first twenty-four (24) hours of release;

A written dischargeplan shall be provided to the offender and supervising probation officeror parole officer, if applicable.

A discharge plancreated for a parole-eligible offender shall also include supervisionconditions and the intensity of supervision based on the assessedrisk to recidivate and whether there is a need for transitional housing.The board shall approve discharge plans before an offender is releasedon parole pursuant to this chapter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 457, § 48, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 47-7-34.
Postrelease supervision
program.

When a courtimposes a sentence upon a conviction for any felony committed afterJune 30, 1995, the court, in addition to any other punishment imposedif the other punishment includes a term of incarceration in a stateor local correctional facility, may impose a term of post-releasesupervision. However, the total number of years of incarceration plusthe total number of years of post-release supervision shall not exceedthe maximum sentence authorized to be imposed by law for the felonycommitted. The defendant shall be placed under post-release supervisionupon release from the term of incarceration. The period of supervisionshall be established by the court.

The period ofpost-release supervision shall be conducted in the same manner asa like period of supervised probation, including a requirement thatthe defendant shall abide by any terms and conditions as the courtmay establish. Failure to successfully abide by the terms and conditionsshall be grounds to terminate the period of post-release supervisionand to recommit the defendant to the correctional facility from whichhe was previously released. Procedures for termination and recommitmentshall be conducted in the same manner as procedures for the revocationof probation and imposition of a suspended sentence as required pursuantto Section 47-7-37.

Post-releasesupervision programs shall be operated through the probation and paroleunit of the Division of Community Corrections of the department. Themaximum amount of time that the Mississippi Department of Correctionsmay supervise an offender on the post-release supervision programis five (5) years.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1995, ch. 596, § 9; Laws, 2000, ch. 622, § 4; Laws, 2002, ch. 624, § 6; Laws, 2014, ch. 457, § 57, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 47-7-35.
Terms and conditions
of probation; court to determine; sex offender registry check required
prior to placing offender on probation.

The courts referredto in Section 47-7-33 or 47-7-34 shall determine theterms and conditions of probation or post-release supervision andmay alter or modify, at any time during the period of probation orpost-release supervision, the conditions and may include among themthe following or any other:

That the offendershall:

Commit no offenseagainst the laws of this or any other state of the United States,or of any federal, territorial or tribal jurisdiction of the UnitedStates;

Avoid injuriousor vicious habits;

Avoid personsor places of disreputable or harmful character;

Report to theprobation and parole officer as directed;

Permit the probationand parole officer to visit him at home or elsewhere;

Work faithfullyat suitable employment so far as possible;

Remain withina specified area;

Pay his finein one (1) or several sums;

Support his dependents;

Submit, as providedin Section 47-5-601, to anytype of breath, saliva or urine chemical analysis test, the purposeof which is to detect the possible presence of alcohol or a substanceprohibited or controlled by any law of the State of Mississippi orthe United States;

Register as asex offender if so required under Title 45, Chapter 33.

When any courtplaces a defendant on misdemeanor probation, the court must causeto be conducted a search of the probationer’s name or otheridentifying information against the registration information regardingsex offenders maintained under Title 45, Chapter 33. The search maybe conducted using the Internet site maintained by the Departmentof Public Safety Sex Offender Registry.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4004-24; Laws, 1956, ch. 262, § 11; brought forward, Laws, 1981, ch. 465, § 107; Laws, 1983, ch. 435, § 6; reenacted, Laws, 1984, ch. 471, § 117; reenacted, Laws, 1986, ch. 413, § 117; Laws, 1995, ch. 596, § 10; Laws, 2006, ch. 566, § 5; Laws, 2007, ch. 392, § 14; Laws, 2011, ch. 359, § 13, eff from and after July 1, 2011.

§ 47-7-36
Persons
who supervise individuals placed on parole or probation shall set
times and locations for required meetings that reasonably accommodate
the work schedules of those individuals.

Any person whosupervisesan individual placed on parole by the Parole Board orplaced on probationby the court shall set the times and locationsfor meetings that arerequired for parole or probation at such timesand locations thatare reasonably designed to accommodate the workschedule of an individualon parole or probation who is employedby another person or entity.To effectuate the provisions of thissection, the parole officer orprobation officer may utilize technologyportals such as Skype, FaceTimeor Google video chat, or any othertechnology portal that allows communicationbetween the individualon parole or probation and the parole or probationofficer, as applicable,to occur simultaneously in real time by voiceand video in lieu ofrequiring a face-to-face in person meeting ofsuch individual andthe parole or probation officer, as applicable.For individuals whoare self-employed, the provisions of this sectionshall only applywith the agreement of their supervising parole orprobation officer.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2018, ch. 416, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 2018.

§ 47-7-37.
Period of probation;
arrest, revocation and recommitment for violation of probation or
postrelease supervision; hearing; revocation of probation for technical
violation; imprisonment in technical violation center; certain restrictions
on imposition of bail for persons required to register as sex offender.

The period ofprobation shall be fixed by the court, and may at any time be extendedor terminated by the court, or judge in vacation. Such period withany extension thereof shall not exceed five (5) years, except thatin cases of desertion and/or failure to support minor children, theperiod of probation may be fixed and/or extended by the court forso long as the duty to support such minor children exists. The timeserved on probation or post-release supervision may be reduced pursuantto Section 47-7-40.

At any time duringthe period of probation, the court, or judge in vacation, may issuea warrant for violating any of the conditions of probation or suspensionof sentence and cause the probationer to be arrested. Any probationand parole officer may arrest a probationer without a warrant, ormay deputize any other officer with power of arrest to do so by givinghim a written statement setting forth that the probationer has, inthe judgment of the probation and parole officer, violated the conditionsof probation. Such written statement delivered with the probationerby the arresting officer to the official in charge of a county jailor other place of detention shall be sufficient warrant for the detentionof the probationer.

Whenever an offenderis arrested on a warrant for an alleged violation of probation asherein provided, the department shall hold an informal preliminaryhearing within seventy-two (72) hours of the arrest to determine whetherthere is reasonable cause to believe the person has violated a conditionof probation. A preliminary hearing shall not be required when theoffender is not under arrest on a warrant or the offender signed awaiver of a preliminary hearing. The preliminary hearing may be conductedelectronically. If reasonable cause is found, the offender may beconfined no more than twenty-one (21) days from the admission to detentionuntil a revocation hearing is held. If the revocation hearing is notheld within twenty-one (21) days, the probationer shall be releasedfrom custody and returned to probation status.

If a probationeror offender is subject to registration as a sex offender, the courtmust make a finding that the probationer or offender is not a dangerto the public prior to release with or without bail. In determiningthe danger posed by the release of the offender or probationer, thecourt may consider the nature and circumstances of the violation andany new offenses charged; the offender or probationer’s pastand present conduct, including convictions of crimes and any recordof arrests without conviction for crimes involving violence or sexcrimes; any other evidence of allegations of unlawful sexual conductor the use of violence by the offender or probationer; the offenderor probationer’s family ties, length of residence in the community,employment history and mental condition; the offender or probationer’shistory and conduct during the probation or other supervised releaseand any other previous supervisions, including disciplinary recordsof previous incarcerations; the likelihood that the offender or probationerwill engage again in a criminal course of conduct; the weight of theevidence against the offender or probationer; and any other factsthe court considers relevant.

The probationand parole officer after making an arrest shall present to the detainingauthorities a similar statement of the circumstances of violation.The probation and parole officer shall at once notify the court ofthe arrest and detention of the probationer and shall submit a reportin writing showing in what manner the probationer has violated theconditions of probation. Within twenty-one (21) days of arrest anddetention by warrant as herein provided, the court shall cause theprobationer to be brought before it and may continue or revoke allor any part of the probation or the suspension of sentence. If thecourt revokes probation for one or more technical violations,the court shall impose a period of imprisonment to be served in eithera technical violation center or a restitution center not to exceedninety (90) days for the first revocation and not to exceed one hundred twenty (120) days for the second revocation. For the third revocation, the court may impose a periodof imprisonment to be served in either a technical violation centeror a restitution center for up to one hundred eighty (180) days orthe court may impose the remainder of the suspended portion of thesentence. For the fourth and any subsequent revocation, the court may impose up to the remainderof the suspended portion of the sentence. The period of imprisonmentin a technical violation center imposed under this section shall notbe reduced in any manner.

If the offenderis not detained as a result of the warrant, the court shall causethe probationer to be brought before it within a reasonable time andmay continue or revoke all or any part of the probation or the suspensionof sentence, and may cause the sentence imposed to be executed ormay impose any part of the sentence which might have been imposedat the time of conviction. If the court revokes probation for one or more technical violations, the court shall impose a period ofimprisonment to be served in either a technical violation center ora restitution center not to exceed ninety (90) days for the first revocation and not to exceed one hundredtwenty (120) days for the second revocation. For the third revocation, the court may impose a period of imprisonment to be served in eithera technical violation center or a restitution center for up to onehundred eighty (180) days or the court may impose the remainder ofthe suspended portion of the sentence. For the fourth and any subsequent revocation, the court may impose upto the remainder of the suspended portion of the sentence. The periodof imprisonment in a technical violation center imposed under thissection shall not be reduced in any manner.

If the courtdoes not hold a hearing or does not take action on the violation withinthe twenty-one-day period, the offender shall be released from detentionand shall return to probation status. The court may subsequently holda hearing and may revoke probation or may continue probation and modifythe terms and conditions of probation. If the court revokes probationfor one or more technicalviolations, the court shallimpose a period of imprisonment to be served in either a technicalviolation center operated by the department or a restitution centernot to exceed ninety (90) days for the first revocation and not to exceed one hundred twenty (120)days for the second revocation. For the third revocation, the court may impose a period of imprisonment to be served in eithera technical violation center or a restitution center for up to onehundred eighty (180) days or the court may impose the remainder ofthe suspended portion of the sentence. For the fourth and any subsequent revocation, the court may impose upto the remainder of the suspended portion of the sentence. The periodof imprisonment in a technical violation center imposed under thissection shall not be reduced in any manner.

For an offendercharged with a technical violation who has not been detained awaitingthe revocation hearing, the court may hold a hearing within a reasonabletime. The court may revoke probation or may continue probation andmodify the terms and conditions of probation. If the court revokesprobation for one or more technical violations thecourt shall impose a period of imprisonment to be served in eithera technical violation center operated by the department or a restitutioncenter not to exceed ninety (90) days for the first revocation and not to exceed one hundredtwenty (120) days for the second revocation. For the third revocation, the court may impose a period of imprisonment to be served in eithera technical violation center or a restitution center for up to onehundred eighty (180) days or the court may impose the remainder ofthe suspended portion of the sentence. For the fourth and any subsequent revocation, the court may impose upto the remainder of the suspended portion of the sentence. The periodof imprisonment in a technical violation center imposed under thissection shall not be reduced in any manner.

If the probationeris arrested in a circuit court district in the State of Mississippiother than that in which he was convicted, the probation and paroleofficer, upon the written request of the sentencing judge, shall furnishto the circuit court or the county court of the county in which thearrest is made, or to the judge of such court, a report concerningthe probationer, and such court or the judge in vacation shall haveauthority, after a hearing, to continue or revoke all or any partof probation or all or any part of the suspension of sentence, andmay in case of revocation proceed to deal with the case as if therehad been no probation. In such case, the clerk of the court in whichthe order of revocation is issued shall forward a transcript of suchorder to the clerk of the court of original jurisdiction, and theclerk of that court shall proceed as if the order of revocation hadbeen issued by the court of original jurisdiction. Upon the revocationof probation or suspension of sentence of any offender, such offendershall be placed in the legal custody of the State Department of Correctionsand shall be subject to the requirements thereof.

Any probationerwho removes himself from the State of Mississippi without permissionof the court placing him on probation, or the court to which jurisdictionhas been transferred, shall be deemed and considered a fugitive fromjustice and shall be subject to extradition as now provided by law.No part of the time that one is on probation shall be considered asany part of the time that he shall be sentenced to serve.

The arrestingofficer, except when a probation and parole officer, shall be allowedthe same fees as now provided by law for arrest on warrant, and suchfees shall be taxed against the probationer and paid as now providedby law.

The arrest, revocationand recommitment procedures of this section also apply to personswho are serving a period of post-release supervision imposed by thecourt.

Unless good causefor the delay is established in the record of the proceeding, theprobation revocation charge shall be dismissed if the revocation hearingis not held within thirty (30) days of the warrant being issued.

The Departmentof Corrections shall provide semiannually to the Oversight Task Forcethe number of warrants issued for an alleged violation of probationor post-release supervision, the average time between detention ona warrant and preliminary hearing, the average time between detentionon a warrant and revocation hearing, the number of ninety-day sentencesin a technical violation center issued by the court, the number ofone-hundred-twenty-day sentences in a technical violation center issuedby the court, the number of one-hundred-eighty-day sentences issuedby the court, and the number and average length of the suspended sentencesimposed by the court in response to a violation.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4004-25; Laws, 1956, ch. 262, § 12; Laws, 1962, ch. 331; brought forward, Laws, 1981, ch. 465, § 108; reenacted, Laws, 1984, ch. 471, § 118; reenacted, Laws, 1986, ch. 413, § 118; Laws, 1990, ch. 331, § 1; Laws, 1992, ch. 395, § 1; Laws, 1995, ch. 596, § 11; Laws, 2006, ch. 566, § 6; Laws, 2014, ch. 457, § 58, eff from and after July 1, 2014; Laws, 2018, ch. 416, § 11, eff from and after July 1, 2018.

§ 47-7-37.1.
Revocation
of probation or post-release supervision.

Notwithstandingany other provision of law to the contrary, if a court finds by apreponderance of the evidence, that a probationer or a person underpost-release supervision has committed a felony or absconded, thecourt may revoke his probation and impose any or all of the sentence.For purposes of this section, “absconding from supervision”means the failure of a probationer to report to his supervising officerfor six (6) or more consecutive months.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 448, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 20, 2015.).